Massachusetts, session 194th, H1372.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 224 6D of the Acts of 2012 is amended by adding the
following
“Weighted Average Payer Rate” or “WAPR”, a measure by which a sum of the inpatient
revenue per discharge and outpatient revenue per visit is separately calculated for Commercial,
Medicare, and Medicaid. A weighted average of the three resulting values is derived, with the
Net Patient Service Revenue - based payer mix of the three payers serving as weights.
SECTION 2. Section 8(a) of Chapter 224 6D of the Acts of 2012 is amended by striking
out Section 8(a) and adding the following
(a) Not later than October 1 of every year, the commission shall hold public hearings
based on the report submitted by the center for health information and analysis under section 16
of 3

of chapter 12C comparing the growth in total health care expenditures to the health care growth
benchmark for the previous calendar year. The hearings shall examine health care provider,
provider organization, and private and public health care payer costs, prices, weighted average
payer rates, and cost trends, with particular attention to factors that contribute to cost growth
within the commonwealth’s health care system.
SECTION 3. Section 8(e) of Chapter 224 6D of the Acts of 2012 is amended by striking
out Section 8(e)(i) and adding the following
(i) in the case of providers and provider organizations, testimony concerning payment
systems, care delivery models, payer mix, cost structures, administrative and labor costs, capital
and technology cost, adequacy of public payer reimbursement levels, reserve levels, utilization
trends, relative price, weighted average payer rate, quality improvement and care-coordination
strategies, investments in health information technology, the relation of private payer
reimbursement levels to public payer reimbursements for similar services, efforts to improve the
efficiency of the delivery system, efforts to reduce the inappropriate or duplicative use of
technology and the impact of price transparency on prices
SECTION 4. Section 13(d) of Chapter 224 6D of the Acts of 2012 is amended by striking
out Section 10(d)(v) and adding the following
(v) provider cost and cost trends including the weighted average payer rate in comparison
to total health care expenditures statewide
SECTION 5. Section 13(d) of Chapter 224 6D of the Acts of 2012 is amended by striking
out Section 13(d)(xii) and adding the following
of 3

(xii) the weighted average payer rate paid to each acute hospital and physician
organization; (xiii) any other factors that the commission determines to be in the public interest.
SECTION 6. Section 1 of Chapter 224 12C of the Acts of 2012 is amended by inserting
the following
“Weighted Average Payer Rate” or “WAPR”, a measure by which a sum of the inpatient
revenue per discharge and outpatient revenue per visit is separately calculated for Commercial,
Medicare, and Medicaid. A weighted average of the three resulting values is derived, with the
Net Patient Service Revenue- based payer mix of the three payers serving as weights.
SECTION 7. Section 10(b) of Chapter 224 12C of the Acts of 2012 is amended by
inserting following section
(12) the weighted average payer rate paid to each acute care hospital and physician
organization
SECTION 8. Section 16(a) of Chapter 224 12C of the Acts of 2012 is amended by adding
the following after the words “patient centered medical homes.”
(6) the weighted average payer rate paid to each acute care hospital, and physician
organization, respectively
of 3